Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1041
Voting and counting methods and locations authorized; approval required; when; electronic voting system prohibited.

(1) The election commissioner or county clerk may use optical-scan ballots or voting systems approved by the Secretary of State to allow registered voters to cast their votes at any election. The election commissioner or county clerk may use vote counting devices and voting systems approved by the Secretary of State for tabulating the votes cast at any election. Vote counting devices shall include electronic counting devices such as optical scanners.

(2) No electronic voting system shall be used under the Election Act.

(3) Any new voting or counting system shall be approved by the Secretary of State prior to use by an election commissioner or county clerk. The Secretary of State may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to establish different procedures and locations for voting and counting votes pursuant to the use of any new voting or counting system. The procedures shall be designed to preserve the safety and confidentiality of each vote cast and the secrecy and security of the counting process, to establish security provisions for the prevention of fraud, and to ensure that the election is conducted in a fair manner.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 335;

Laws 1997, LB 526, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 358, § 37;

Laws 2005, LB 401, § 10;

Laws 2007, LB646, § 14;

Laws 2019, LB411, § 57.